Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3107
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the School Safety and Security Reporting System Act.

Laws 2021, LB322, § 7.
July 1, 2021